Missouri, session 2026, HB2082.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 303.020, 303.190, and 379.204, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 303.020, 303.190, and 379.204,
to read as follows:
303.020. As used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall mean:
(1) "Chauffeur", a person who is employed for the principal purpose of operating a
motor vehicle or any person who drives a motor vehicle while in use as a public or common
carrier of persons or property for hire;
(2) "Director", director of revenue of the state of Missouri, acting directly or through
his authorized officers and agents;
(3) "Judgment", a final judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or
of the United States, upon a claim for relief for damages, including damages for care and loss
of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of
injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon a claim for relief
on any agreement or settlement for such damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance
or use of any motor vehicle;
(4) "License", an operator's or driver's license, temporary instruction permit,
chauffeur's or registered operator's license issued under the laws of this state;
(5) "Motor vehicle", a self-propelled vehicle which is designed for use upon a
highway, except trailers designed for use with such vehicles, traction engines, road rollers,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2082 2
farm tractors, tractor cranes, power shovels, well drillers, motorized bicycles as defined in
section 307.180, electric bicycles as defined in section 301.010, and every vehicle which is
propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not operated upon rails;
(6) "Nonresident", a person not a resident of the state of Missouri;
(7) "Nonresident's operating privilege", the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by
the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by him of a motor vehicle, or the use of a
motor vehicle owned by him in this state;
(8) "Operator", a person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle;
(9) "Owner", a person who holds the legal title to a motor vehicle; or in the event a
motor vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof with the
right of purchase upon performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an
immediate right of possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a
mortgagor of a motor vehicle is entitled to possession thereof, then such conditional vendee
or lessee or mortgagor;
(10) "Proof of financial responsibility", proof of ability to respond in damages for
liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of said proof,
arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of [twenty-
five] fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one
accident, and, subject to said limit for one person, in the amount of [fifty] one hundred
thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or death of two or more persons in any one
accident, and in the amount of [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars because of injury to or
destruction of property of others in any one accident;
(11) "Registration", registration certificate or certificates and registration plates
issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of motor vehicles;
(12) "State", any state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of
Columbia, or any province of the Dominion of Canada;
(13) "Street" or "highway", the entire width between property lines of every way or
place of whatever nature when any part thereof is open to the use of the public, as a matter of
right, for purposes of vehicular traffic.
303.190. 1. A "motor vehicle liability policy" as said term is used in this chapter shall
mean an owner's or an operator's policy of liability insurance, certified as provided in section
303.170 or section 303.180 as proof of financial responsibility, and issued, except as
otherwise provided in section 303.180 by an insurance carrier duly authorized to transact
business in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named therein as insured.
2. Such owner's policy of liability insurance:
(1) Shall designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor
vehicles with respect to which coverage is thereby to be granted;

HB 2082 3
(2) Shall insure the person named therein and any other person, as insured, using any
such motor vehicle or motor vehicles with the express or implied permission of such named
insured, against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the
ownership, maintenance or use of such motor vehicle or motor vehicles within the United
States of America or the Dominion of Canada, subject to limits, exclusive of interest and
costs, with respect to each such motor vehicle, as follows: [twenty-five] fifty thousand
dollars because of bodily injury to or death of one person in any one accident and, subject to
said limit for one person, [fifty] one hundred thousand dollars because of bodily injury to or
death of two or more persons in any one accident, and [twenty-five] fifty thousand dollars
because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident; and
(3) May exclude coverage against loss from liability imposed by law for damages
arising out of the use of such motor vehicles by a member of the named insured's household
who is a specifically excluded driver in the policy.
3. Such operator's policy of liability insurance shall insure the person named as
insured therein against loss from the liability imposed upon him or her by law for damages
arising out of the use by him or her of any motor vehicle not owned by him or her, within the
said territorial limits and subject to the same limits of liability as are set forth above with
respect to any owner's policy of liability insurance.
4. Such motor vehicle liability policy shall state the name and address of the named
insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the premium charged therefor, the policy period
and the limits of liability, and shall contain an agreement or be endorsed that insurance is
provided thereunder in accordance with the coverage defined in this chapter as respects
bodily injury and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of this
chapter.
5. Such motor vehicle liability policy need not insure any liability pursuant to any
workers' compensation law nor any liability on account of bodily injury to or death of an
employee of the insured while engaged in the employment, other than domestic, of the
insured, or while engaged in the operation, maintenance or repair of any such motor vehicle
nor any liability for damage to property owned by, rented to, in charge of or transported by the
insured.
6. Every motor vehicle liability policy shall be subject to the following provisions
which need not be contained therein:
(1) The liability of the insurance carrier with respect to the insurance required by this
chapter shall become absolute whenever injury or damage covered by said motor vehicle
liability policy occurs; said policy may not be cancelled or annulled as to such liability by any
agreement between the insurance carrier and the insured after the occurrence of the injury or

HB 2082 4
damage; no statement made by the insured or on his or her behalf and no violation of said
policy shall defeat or void said policy;
(2) The satisfaction by the insured of a judgment for such injury or damage shall not
be a condition precedent to the right or duty of the insurance carrier to make payment on
account of such injury or damage;
(3) The insurance carrier shall have the right to settle any claim covered by the policy,
and if such settlement is made in good faith, the amount thereof shall be deductible from the
limits of liability specified in subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section;
(4) The policy, the written application thereof, if any, and any rider or endorsement
which does not conflict with the provisions of this chapter shall constitute the entire contract
between the parties.
7. Any policy which grants the coverage required for a motor vehicle liability policy
may also grant any lawful coverage in excess of or in addition to the coverage specified for a
motor vehicle liability policy and such excess or additional coverage shall not be subject to
the provisions of this chapter. With respect to a policy which grants such excess or additional
coverage the term "motor vehicle liability policy" shall apply only to that part of the coverage
which is required by this section.
8. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the
insurance carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not have been obligated to
make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of this chapter.
9. Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide for the prorating of the insurance
thereunder with other valid and collectible insurance.
10. The requirements of a motor vehicle liability policy may be fulfilled by the
policies of one or more insurance carriers which policies together meet such requirements.
11. Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy shall be
deemed to fulfill the requirement for such a policy.
379.204. Any underinsured motor vehicle coverage [with limits of liability less than
two times the limits for bodily injury or death pursuant to section 303.020] shall be construed
to provide coverage in excess of the liability coverage of any [underinsured] motor vehicle
involved in the accident.
✔